test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_jyelgi_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - siergi: # ok JYELGI
    siergi+N+Sg+Nom:   sierˊgi
    siergi+N+Sg+Gen:   siergi
    siergi+N+Sg+Acc:   siergi
    siergi+N+Sg+Ill:   siärgán
    siergi+N+Sg+Loc:   siergist
    siergi+N+Sg+Com:   sierˊgijn
    siergi+N+Sg+Abe:   sieˊrgittáá
    siergi+N+Ess:      sierˊgin
    siergi+N+Par:      sierˊgid
    siergi+N+Pl+Nom:   siergih
    siergi+N+Pl+Gen:  [siergij, sieˊrgij]
    siergi+N+Pl+Acc:   siergijd
    siergi+N+Pl+Ill:   sierˊgijd
    siergi+N+Pl+Loc:   siergijn
    siergi+N+Pl+Com:   sieˊrgijguin
    siergi+N+Pl+Abe:   sieˊrgijttáá
    
  Noun - jyelgi: # ok JYELGI
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Nom:   jyelˊgi
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Gen:   jyelgi
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Acc:   jyelgi
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Ill:   juálgán
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Loc:   jyelgist
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Com:   juolˊgijn
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Abe:   jyeˊlgittáá
    jyelgi+N+Ess:      jyelˊgin
    jyelgi+N+Par:      jyelˊgid
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Nom:   jyelgih
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Gen:  [juolgij, juoˊlgij]
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Acc:   juolgijd
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Ill:   juolˊgijd
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Loc:   juolgijn
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Com:   juoˊlgijguin
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Abe:   juoˊlgijttáá

  Noun - syergi: # ok JYELGI
    syergi+N+Sg+Nom:   syerˊgi
    syergi+N+Sg+Gen:   syergi
    syergi+N+Sg+Acc:   syergi
    syergi+N+Sg+Ill:   suárgán
    syergi+N+Sg+Loc:   syergist
    syergi+N+Sg+Com:   suorˊgijn
    syergi+N+Sg+Abe:   syeˊrgittáá
    syergi+N+Ess:      syerˊgin
    syergi+N+Par:      syerˊgid
    syergi+N+Pl+Nom:   syergih
    syergi+N+Pl+Gen:  [suorgij, suoˊrgij]
    syergi+N+Pl+Acc:   suorgijd
    syergi+N+Pl+Ill:   suorˊgijd
    syergi+N+Pl+Loc:   suorgijn
    syergi+N+Pl+Com:   suoˊrgijguin
    syergi+N+Pl+Abe:   suoˊrgijttáá

  Noun - lyevdi: # ok JYELGI
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Nom:   lyevˊdi
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Gen:   lyevdi
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Acc:   lyevdi
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Ill:   luávdán
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Loc:   lyevdist
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Com:   luovˊdijn
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Abe:   lyeˊvdittáá
    lyevdi+N+Ess:      lyevˊdin
    lyevdi+N+Par:      lyevˊdid
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Nom:   lyevdih
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Gen:  [luovdij, luoˊvdij]
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Acc:   luovdijd
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Ill:   luovˊdijd
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Loc:   luovdijn
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Com:   luoˊvdijguin
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Abe:   luoˊvdijttáá
